Maryland, session 2026, HB1499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
8–617.
(a) A person may not demand or receive any payment for a home improvement
before the home improvement contract is signed.
(b) A person may not receive a deposit of more than [one–third] ONE–HALF of
the home improvement contract price before or at the time of execution of the home
improvement contract.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1499*